Washington statutes.
RCW 18.22.035

Practice of podiatric medicine and surgery—Quality—Definition—Prescriptions—Limitations.

(1) A podiatric physician and surgeon is responsible for the quality of podiatric care.

(2) The practice of podiatric medicine and surgery is the diagnosis and the medical, surgical, mechanical, manipulative, and electrical treatments of ailments of the human foot.

(3) Podiatric physicians and surgeons may issue prescriptions valid at any pharmacy for any drug, including narcotics, necessary in the practice of podiatry.

(4) Podiatrists shall not:

(a) Amputate the foot;

(b) Administer spinal anesthetic or any anesthetic that renders the patient unconscious; or

(c) Treat systemic conditions.

[ 1990 c 147 s 6.]